Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.525

First responder peer support network—Professional directory.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the commission shall contract with an organization that provides free and confidential crisis response and referral services for Washington state active and retired first responders and their families, to develop and maintain:

(a) A first responder peer support network, which may include individual and group support options to help first responder peer supporters address the vicarious trauma and secondary traumatic stress incurred by performing their peer support duties; and

(b) A directory of licensed mental health and substance use disorder professionals who have cultural competency, experience, and training with treating first responders, which must indicate whether such professionals have completed the training established under RCW 43.101.520.

(2) The commission may also contract with an organization with expertise in peer emotional support and peer workforce development to provide technical assistance in developing the first responder peer support network described in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

(3) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "First responder" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 5.60.060; and

(b) "Peer supporters" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 5.60.060.

[ 2024 c 295 s 4.]